nb: Støttede innganger typer: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Instrument (Hi-Z); Linje; Mikrofon; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; Annet
da: Understøttede indgangstyper: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Instrument (Hi-Z); Line; Mikrofon; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; Andet
fi: Tuetut tulotyypit: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Instrumentti (Hi-Z); Linja; Mikrofoni; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; Muu
sv: Ingångstyper som stöds: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Instrument (Hi-Z); Line; Mikrofon; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; Övrigt
hu: Támogatott bemenettípusok: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Hangszer (Hi-Z); Vonal; Mikrofon; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; Egyéb
tr: Desteklenen giriş türleri: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Enstrüman (Hi-Z); Hat; Mikrofon; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; Diğer
cs: Podporované typy vstupů: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Nástroj (Hi-Z); Linkový; Mikrofon; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; Jiné
fr: Types d’entrées pris en charge: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Instrument (Hi-Z); Ligne; Micro; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; Autre
pl: Obsługiwane typy wejść: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Instrument (Hi-Z); Liniowe; Mikrofonowe; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; Inne
sl-SI: Podprti tipi vhoda: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Instrument (Hi-Z); Linijski; Mikrofon; S/PDIF; USB; Besedna ura; Drugo
en: Supported input types: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Instrument (Hi-Z); Line; Mic; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; Other
pt-BR: Tipos de entrada compatíveis: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Instrumento (Hi-Z); Linha; Microfone; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; Outro
lt-LT: Palaikomi įvesties tipai: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Instrumentas (Hi-Z); Linijinis; Mikrofonas; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; Kita
nl: Ondersteunde invoertypen: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Instrument (Hi-Z); Lijn; Microfoon; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; Andere
bg-BG: Поддържани типове входове: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Инструментален (Hi-Z); Линеен; Микрофон; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; Други
hr-HR: Podržane vrste ulaza: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Instrument (Hi-Z); Linijski; Mikrofon; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; Ostalo
it: Tipi di input supportati: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Strumento (Hi-Z); Linea; Microfono; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; Altro
th: ประเภทอินพุตที่รองรับ: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; อินพุตเครื่องดนตรี (Hi-Z); ไลน์; ไมค์; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; อื่นๆ
vi: Loại đầu vào được hỗ trợ: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Nhạc cụ (Hi-Z); Line; Mic; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; Khác
pt-PT: Tipos de entrada suportados: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Instrumento (Hi-Z); Linha; Microfone; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; Outro
ko: 지원 입력 유형: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; 악기 (Hi-Z); 라인; 마이크; S/PDIF; USB; 워드 클록; 기타
es: Tipos de entrada admitidos: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Instrumento (Hi-Z); Línea; Micrófono; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; Otros
el: Υποστηριζόμενοι τύποι εισόδου: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Όργανο (Hi-Z); Γραμμή; Μικρόφωνο; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; Άλλο
ja: サポートされる入力タイプ: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; 楽器（ハイインピーダンス）; ライン; マイク; S/PDIF; USB; ワードクロック; その他
sk-SK: Podporované typy vstupov: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Nástrojový (Hi-Z); Linkový; Mikrofónny; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; Iné
ro-RO: Tipuri de intrare acceptate: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Instrument (Hi-Z); Linie; Microfon; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; Altele
de: Unterstützte Eingangstypen: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Instrument (Hi-Z); Line; Mikrofon; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; Sonstiges
ru: Поддерживаемые типы входов: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; Инструмент (Hi-Z); Линейный; Микрофон; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; Другой
zh-CN: 支持的输入类型: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; 乐器（高阻）; 线路; 麦克风; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; 其他
zh-TW: 支援的輸入類型: ADAT; AES; DI; EBU; 樂器（高阻抗）; Line; 麥克風; S/PDIF; USB; Word Clock; 其他